Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1111
Fertilizer, defined.

Fertilizer shall mean any formulation or product used as a plant nutrient which is intended to promote plant growth and contains one or more plant nutrients recognized by the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials in its official publication.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 11.